NO.23 A/C DOES NOT WORK SUFFICIENTLY [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)]
id0103b3802900
23 |
A/C DOES NOT WORK SUFFICIENTLY |
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DESCRIPTION
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• The A/C compressor magnetic clutch does not engage when the A/C switch is turned on.
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POSSIBLE CAUSE
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• Improper refrigerant charge amount
• Open A/C switch magnetic clutch
• Open circuit between A/C relay and A/C magnetic clutch
• Poor GND of A/C magnetic clutch
• Improper A/C magnetic clutch clearance
• Refrigerant pressure switch is stuck open
• A/C relay is stuck open
• Improper A/C cut-off control
• Open circuit between A/C switch and PCM through both refrigerant pressure switch and A/C amplifier
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Diagnostic Procedure
STEP |
INSPECTION |
RESULTS |
ACTION |
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1
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Perform the self-test function using the M-MDS.
Turn the engine switch to the ON position.
Retrieve any DTC.
Are DTCs displayed?
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Yes
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DTC is displayed:
Go to the appropriate DTC test.
Communication error message is displayed:
Inspect for the following:
• Open circuit between PCM control relay and PCM terminal 236 or 231
• Open circuit between PCM control relay and PCM terminal 241
• PCM control relay stuck open
• Open or poor ground circuit (PCM terminal 307, 308 or 332)
• Poorly connected vehicle body ground
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Yes
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No DTC is displayed:
Go to the appropriate DTC test.
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2
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Disconnect the A/C compressor connector.
Start the engine and turn the A/C switch to on.
Is there correct voltage at terminal of A/C compressor magnetic clutch connector?
Specification
More than 10.5 V
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Yes
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Inspect for ground condition of the magnetic clutch on the A/C compressor.
If the ground condition is normal, inspect the magnetic clutch coil for open circuit.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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3
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Disconnect the refrigerant pressure switch connector.
Connect the jumper wire between terminals of refrigerant pressure switch connector.
Turn the engine switch to the ON position.
Turn the A/C switch on and set the blower fan at any speed.
Measure the PCM terminal 303 voltage.
Is the voltage below 1.0 V?
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Yes
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Inspect the refrigerant pressure switch operation.
If the switch is normal, go to the next step.
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No
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Inspect for the following:
• A/C switch is stuck open
• Open circuit between refrigerant pressure switch and PCM terminal 303
• Open circuit of blower motor fan switch and resistor (if blower motor does not operate)
• Evaporator temperature sensor and A/C amplifier
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4
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Inspect A/C cut-off operation.
Does the A/C cut-off operate properly?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Repair or replace malfunctioning part according to the A/C cut-off system inspection results.
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5
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Remove the jumper wire from the switch connector.
Reconnect the connector to the refrigerant pressure switch.
Start the engine and turn the A/C switch on.
Does the fan operate?
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Yes
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Inspect the A/C relay for stuck open.
Replace if necessary.
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No
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Inspect the following and repair or replace if necessary:
• Refrigerant charging amount
• Seized A/C compressor
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6
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Verify test results.
• If normal, return to diagnostic index to service any additional symptoms. (See SYMPTOM DIAGNOSTIC INDEX [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)].)
• If the malfunction remains, inspect related Service Information and perform repair or diagnosis.
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